Maine, session 132, LD616.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Archives 0050
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the Maine Semiquincentennial Commission to
pay for public programs as a state match to private funding.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $250,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $250,000 $0